Maryland, session 2026, HB0719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
[2–104.2.
(a) In this section, “sensitive location” has the meaning stated in § 6–111 of the
State Government Article.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to a State or local correctional facility or
a detention facility in a District Court or circuit court house.
(2) A public school, a public library, or a unit of the Executive Branch of
State or local government that operates at a sensitive location shall deny access to any
portion of the sensitive location that is not accessible to the general public to any individual
who is seeking access for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law, unless:
(i) the individual presents a valid warrant issued by a federal court;
or
(ii) exigent circumstances exist.]
[5–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Civil immigration violation” means a violation of federal civil
immigration law.
(3) “Family member” means a relative by blood, adoption, or marriage.
(4) “Household member” means a person who lives with another or is a
regular presence in the home of another.
(5) (i) “Law enforcement agent” means an individual who is certified by
the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under § 3–209 of the Public
Safety Article.
(ii) “Law enforcement agent” does not include an agent or employee
of a State correctional facility or a local correctional facility.

HOUSE BILL 719 3
(6) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(7) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “arrest” does not include a routine booking
procedure.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a law
enforcement agent may not, during the performance of regular police functions:
(i) inquire about an individual’s citizenship, immigration status, or
place of birth during a stop, a search, or an arrest;
(ii) detain, or prolong the detention of, an individual:
1. for the purpose of investigating the individual’s
citizenship or immigration status; or
2. based on the suspicion that the individual has committed
a civil immigration violation;
(iii) transfer an individual to federal immigration authorities unless
required by federal law; or
(iv) coerce, intimidate, or threaten any individual based on the actual
or perceived citizenship or immigration status of the individual or:
1. the individual’s family member;
2. the individual’s household member;
3. the individual’s legal guardian; or
4. another individual for whom the individual is a legal
guardian.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a law enforcement agent from
inquiring about any information that is material to a criminal investigation.
(4) If the citizenship or immigration status of an individual is relevant to a
protection accorded to the individual under State or federal law, or subject to a requirement
imposed by international treaty, a law enforcement agent may:
(i) notify the individual of the protection or requirement; and

HOUSE BILL 719
(ii) provide the individual an opportunity to voluntarily disclose the
individual’s citizenship or immigration status for the purpose of receiving the protection or
complying with the requirement.]
Article – General Provisions
[4–320.1.
(a) In this section, “facial recognition” means a biometric software application
that identifies or verifies a person by comparing and analyzing patterns based on a person’s
facial contours.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an officer, an
employee, an agent, or a contractor of the State or a political subdivision shall deny
inspection of the part of a public record that contains personal information or inspection of
a photograph of an individual by any federal agency seeking access for the purpose of
enforcing federal immigration law, unless the officer, employee, agent, or contractor is
provided with a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an officer, an
employee, an agent, or a contractor of the State or a political subdivision shall deny
inspection using a facial recognition search of a digital photographic image or actual stored
data of a digital photographic image by any federal agency seeking access for the purpose
of enforcing federal immigration law, unless the officer, employee, agent, or contractor is
provided with a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State.
(3) On or before June 1, 2023, and each June 1 thereafter, the Motor
Vehicle Administration, the Department of State Police, and the Department of Public
Safety and Correctional Services shall, with respect to requests from federal agencies
seeking access for the purpose of federal immigration enforcement for personal information,
a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search, whether or not the request
was initiated through a State or local law enforcement agency, report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year:
(i) the number of requests received from any federal agency for
personal information, a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search;
(ii) the number of requests received from any federal agency for
personal information, a photograph of an individual, or a facial recognition search for which
a valid warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State was provided;
(iii) the number and purpose of facial recognition searches completed
for any federal agency based on personal information or a photograph of an individual
provided to the federal agency by the Motor Vehicle Administration, the Department of
State Police, or the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services; and

HOUSE BILL 719 5
(iv) the number of individuals whose personal information or
photograph was provided to any federal agency by, respectively, the Motor Vehicle
Administration, the Department of State Police, and the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.]
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 7. IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT.
1–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “IMMIGRATION DETAINER” MEANS A FACIALLY SUFFICIENT WRITTEN
OR ELECTRONIC REQUEST ISSUED BY A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY USING
THAT AGENCY’S OFFICIAL FORM TO REQUEST THAT ANOTHER AGENCY DETAIN AN
INDIVIDUAL BASED ON PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE INDIVIDUAL TO BE
DETAINED IS A REMOVABLE ALIEN UNDER FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAW.
(C) “SANCTUARY POLICY” MEANS A LAW, POLICY, PRACTICE, PROCEDURE,
OR CUSTOM ADOPTED OR ALLOWED BY A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY
THAT PROHIBITS OR IMPEDES ANY STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY FROM:
(1) COMMUNICATING WITH A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY;
(2) COOPERATING WITH A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY;
(3) COMPLYING WITH AN IMMIGRATION DETAINER;
(4) COMPLYING WITH A REQUEST FROM A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AGENCY TO NOTIFY THE FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY BEFORE THE RELEASE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE CUSTODY OF THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(5) PROVIDING A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY ACCESS TO AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL FOR AN INTERVIEW;
(6) PARTICIPATING IN ANY PROGRAM OR AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED
UNDER 8 U.S.C. § 1357;
(7) PROVIDING A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AGENCY WITH THE
INCARCERATION STATUS OR RELEASE DATE OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL;

HOUSE BILL 719
(8) PROVIDING INFORMATION TO ANOTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY
ON THE IMMIGRATION STATUS OF AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE CUSTODY OF THE STATE
OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(9) EXECUTING A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT; OR
(10) PARTICIPATING IN A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
OPERATION WITH A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITY AS AUTHORIZED BY STATE
AND FEDERAL LAW.
1–702.
THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, OR AN
AGENCY, AN OFFICER, AN EMPLOYEE, OR AN AGENT OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF
LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT ADOPT OR HAVE IN EFFECT A SANCTUARY POLICY.
[3–529.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Database” means any database operated by State and local law
enforcement agencies, including databases maintained for a law enforcement agency by a
private vendor.
(ii) “Database” does not include a registry operated under Title 11,
Subtitle 7 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(3) (i) “Law enforcement agency” means a federal, state, or local agency
authorized to enforce criminal laws.
(ii) “Law enforcement agency” includes the Maryland Department of
Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) An entity operating a database shall:
(1) deny access to the database to any individual who is seeking access for
the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law, unless the individual presents a valid
warrant issued by a federal court or a court of this State; and
(2) require an individual accessing the database to provide to the entity:
(i) the individual’s name;
(ii) the individual’s contact information, including a telephone
number, an e–mail address, and a physical address; and

HOUSE BILL 719 7
(iii) unless the individual presents a valid warrant issued by a federal
court or a court of this State, a statement by the individual, under penalty of perjury, that
the individual is not accessing the database for the purpose of enforcing federal
immigration law.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.